Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0795.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1e. (1) A landlord shall offer a tenant the option of having the tenant's positive rental payment information reported to at least a consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis or any other consumer reporting agency only if the consumer reporting agency resells or otherwise furnishes the rental payment information to a consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis. (2) For a lease agreement entered into on and after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the offer of positive rental payment information reporting must be made at the time the lease agreement is signed and at least once annually thereafter. For a lease agreement entered into before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the offer of positive rental payment information reporting must be made no later than 60 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, and at least once annually thereafter. (3) A landlord may provide the offer of positive rental payment information reporting required under subsection (1) to the tenant by first-class United States mail or email. If the offer of positive rental payment information reporting is made by first-class United States mail, the landlord shall provide the tenant with a self-addressed, stamped envelope to return the written election of positive rental payment information reporting. (4) An offer of positive rental payment information reporting must include all of the following information: (a) A statement that the reporting of the tenant's positive rental payment information is optional. (b) A list of each consumer reporting agency to which the positive rental payment information must be reported. (c) The amount of any fee charged. (d) Instructions on how to submit the written election of positive rental payment information reporting to the landlord by first-class United States mail or email. (e) A statement that the tenant may opt into positive rental payment information reporting at any time following the initial offer by the landlord. (f) A statement that the tenant may elect to stop positive rental payment information reporting at any time, but that the tenant will not be able to resume positive rental payment information reporting for at least 6 months after the election to opt out. (g) Instructions on how to opt out of positive rental payment information reporting. (h) A signature block that the tenant shall date and sign to accept the offer of positive rental payment information reporting. (5) If a tenant elects to have that tenant's positive rental payment information reported under this section, the landlord may require the tenant to pay a fee not to exceed the lesser of the actual cost to the landlord to provide the service or $10.00 per month, whichever is less. A landlord shall not charge a fee if the landlord does not incur any actual cost to report positive rental payment information. The payment or nonpayment of a fee under this subsection by the tenant must not be reported to a consumer reporting agency. (6) All of the following apply if a tenant fails to pay any fees required by the landlord under subsection (5): (a) An amount paid by the tenant in full or partial satisfaction of the rent must not be applied or credited to the fee. (b) Failure of the tenant to pay the fee is not cause for termination of the tenancy. (c) The landlord shall not deduct the unpaid fee from the tenant's security deposit. (d) If the fee remains unpaid for 30 days or more, the landlord may stop reporting the tenant's rental payments, and the tenant shall not elect to have the tenant's positive rental payment information reported for a period of 6 months after the date the fee first became due. (7) A tenant who elects to have the tenant's positive rental payment information reported may subsequently file a written request with the landlord to stop the reporting. A tenant who elects to stop reporting is not allowed to elect positive rental payment information reporting for at least 6 months after the date of the tenant's written request. (8) This section does not apply to any of the following: (a) A landlord of a residential rental building that contains 15 or fewer dwelling units, unless both of the following apply: (i) The landlord owns more than 1 residential rental building, regardless of the number of units in each building. (ii) The landlord is 1 of the following: (A) A real estate investment trust, as that term is defined in 26 USC 856. (B) A corporation. (C) A limited liability company in which at least 1 member is a corporation. (b) An assisted housing development. (9) As used in this section: (a) "Consumer reporting agency" means that term as defined in section 603(f) of the fair credit reporting act, 15 USC 1681a(f). (b) "Consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis" means that term as defined in section 603(p) of the fair credit reporting act, 15 USC 1681a(p). (c) "Positive rental payment information" means information regarding a tenant's complete and timely payments of rent. Positive payment information does not include an instance of incomplete or untimely payment of rent.